Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-520.04
Land-management burning; permit;
issuance; when.

The fire chief of a local fire department may
waive an open burning ban under subsection (1) of section 81-520.01 by issuing
a permit for land-management burning only
if the land-management burning is
to be conducted in accordance with section 81-520.05.

Laws 1994, LB 408, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB248, § 3.